Illinois, session 104th, HB1478.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 12C-16 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12C-16 new)7    Sec. 12C-16. Fentanyl-related child endangerment; 8aggravated fentanyl-related child endangerment.9    (a) In this Section: 10    "Child" means a person under 18 years of age.11    "Fentanyl" means the substance described in paragraph (8) 12of subsection (c) of Section 206 of the Illinois Controlled 13Substances Act. 14    (b)(1) Fentanyl-related child endangerment. A person 15commits fentanyl-related child endangerment when the person 16knowingly or recklessly endangers the life or health of a 17child by exposing or allowing exposure of the child to 18fentanyl, including consumption of fentanyl. Exposure to 19fentanyl as prescribed or administered by a health care 20professional in the course of medical treatment does not 21constitute endangerment.22    (2) Sentence. A person who violates paragraph (1) of this 23subsection (b) is guilty of a Class 2 felony.  HB1478- 2 -LRB104 03490 RLC 13513 b1    (c)(1) Aggravated fentanyl-related child endangerment. A 2person commits aggravated fentanyl-related child endangerment 3when the person violates paragraph (1) of subsection (b) and 4the child experiences death, great bodily harm, disability, or 5disfigurement as a result of the fentanyl-related child 6endangerment.7    (2) Sentence. A person who violates paragraph (1) of this 8subsection (c) is guilty of a Class X felony and shall be 9sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than 6 years 10and not more than 30 years and fined not to exceed $100,000.